District of Columbia statutes.
7-2231.10

Rules for use of surveillance cameras.

(a)

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, shall issue rules for the use of surveillance cameras and technology in the operation of its Video Interoperability for Public Safety (“VIPS”) program; provided, that the Agency shall not use cameras maintained or monitored by either the Department of Corrections or the Metropolitan Police Department. The proposed rules shall be submitted to the Council for a 45-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed rules, by resolution, within this 45-day review period, the proposed rules shall be deemed disapproved.

(b)

Until rules are issued and approved pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, the use of any video surveillance cameras that are part of the VIPS program shall be governed by the regulations promulgated pursuant to the Use of Closed Circuit Television to Combat Crime Amendment Act of 2006, effective March 14, 2007 (D.C. Law 16-284; 54 DCR 938), and published in Chapter 25 of Title 24 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations.

(c)

The Metropolitan Police Department shall maintain a right of access to all surveillance cameras and technology in the VIPS program, without limitation, except as stated in applicable rules or regulations governing the VIPS program.

History

Aug. 11, 1950, 64 Stat. 440, ch. 686, § 210
as added Aug. 16, 2008, D.C. Law 17-219, § 3008, 55 DCR 7598
Mar. 5, 2010, D.C. Law 18-113, § 2, 57 DCR 487

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 18-113, in subsec. (a), substituted “program; provided, that the Agency shall not use cameras maintained or monitored by either the Department of Corrections or the Metropolitan Police Department.” for “program.”; and added subsec. (c).

Short Title

Short title: Section 3007 of D.C. Law 17-219 provided that subtitle C of title III of the act may be cited as the “Homeland Security and Emergency Management Agency Video Surveillance Rules Amendment Act of 2008”.

Delegation of Authority

Delegation of Authority Pursuant to section 3008 of D.C. Law 17-219, the Homeland Security and Emergency Management Agency Video Surveillance Rules Act of 2008, see Mayor’s Order 2008-135, October 10, 2008 ( 55 DCR 11216).